Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 2 COLORADO UNIVERSAL PRESCHOOL PROGRAM
26.5-4-208. Preschool provider funding - per-child rates - local contribution - distribution and use of money - definitions - repeal.

The department, in accordance with the intent specified in section 26.5-4-202 (3), shall annually establish the per-child rates for universal preschool services, for preschool services for children with disabilities, for preschool services for eligible children who are three years of age or younger as described in section 26.5-4-204 (3)(a)(III) and (3)(a)(IV), and for additional preschool services. In establishing the per-child rates, the department, at a minimum, shall ensure that the per-child rate for preschool services for children with disabilities is at least equal to the greater of the per-child rate for universal preschool services or the state per pupil preschool funding rate for children with disabilities for the 2022-23 budget year, as defined in subsection (6) of this section. The department shall adopt one or more formulas for annually setting the per-child rates, which formulas must, at a minimum, take into account:

The cost of providing preschool services that meet the quality standards established in department rule pursuant to section 26.5-4-205 (2);

The responsibilities of the state and administrative units to meet the special education funding maintenance of effort requirements specified in IDEA;

Variations in the cost of providing preschool services that result from regional differences and circumstances, which may include difficulties in achieving economies of scale in rural areas and in recruiting and retaining preschool educators; and

Variations in the cost of providing preschool services that result from the characteristics of children, which must include a child's identification as a child in a low-income family, and may include, but need not be limited to, a child's identification as a dual language learner.

In establishing the formulas described in subsection (1)(a) of this section and annually setting the per-child rates, the department must consider strategies to mitigate the effect of preschool funding on the availability of child care services for infants and toddlers within communities and areas in the state.

In establishing the formula for additional preschool services, in addition to the considerations specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section, the department may consider the amount of local funding available to assist families within a community based on the community plan or available within an area that does not have a local coordinating organization. A preschool provider is prohibited from charging a fee for additional preschool services to a family that participates in the preschool program that exceeds the amount charged to families that do not receive additional preschool services.

In addition to distributing funding based on the per-child rates established pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, the department may by rule distribute funding to achieve a specified purpose, which may include funding for administrative units to provide special education services through the preschool program and funding for measures related to recruiting, training, and retaining preschool educators. The department may choose to distribute funding pursuant to this subsection (1)(d) only after the department allocates the amounts necessary to fund preschool services for eligible children who are three years of age or younger, up to the amounts described in subsection (2)(c) of this section, and to fully fund universal preschool services for all eligible children who enroll.

In establishing the formulas and other distribution amounts, the department shall consult with the rules advisory council, the early childhood leadership commission, and members of the early childhood community, including parents of preschool-age children, preschool educators, preschool providers, early childhood councils, school districts, charter schools, representatives of county departments of human services and social services, local coordinating organizations, and individuals with financial expertise in public and private funding sources for early childhood services.

Before finalizing the per-child rates in a fiscal year, the department shall:

Ensure that the per-child rates for universal preschool services, for preschool services for children with disabilities, and for preschool services for eligible children who are three years of age or younger as described in section 26.5-4-204 (3)(a)(III) and (3)(a)(IV) meet or exceed the constitutional compliance rate for the applicable fiscal year, as described in subsection (2)(a)(II) of this section.

For the 2023-24 fiscal year, the constitutional compliance rate is forty percent of the statewide base per pupil funding that the general assembly establishes in section 22-54-104 (5)(a) for the 2023-24 fiscal year. For the 2024-25 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the constitutional compliance rate is the 2023-24 fiscal year constitutional compliance rate increased annually, beginning in the 2024-25 fiscal year, by the rate of inflation.

Compare the amount of funding that the per-child rates direct toward universal preschool services with the amount of funding the rates direct toward additional preschool services and prepare an analysis of the efficacy of the balance between funding for universal preschool services and additional preschool services in optimizing support for children in low-income families and children who meet qualifying factors while ensuring high-quality universal preschool services. The department shall make the analysis available to the public.

Consider the impact on the level of funding for preschool providers as a result of the per-child rates and the levels of enrollment as compared to previous state fiscal years, including state fiscal years preceding the 2023-24 state fiscal year. The department may consider a specified purpose distribution as described in subsection (1)(d) of this section to reduce any impact on the level of funding for preschool providers.

Beginning in the 2023-24 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the department, working with local coordinating organizations as provided in each local coordinating organization's coordinator agreement with the department, shall distribute the funding appropriated to the department for preschool services from the preschool programs cash fund and any amount received pursuant to section 26.5-4-209 (2). The department and local coordinating organizations, as applicable, shall base the amounts distributed on the per-child rates and any special purpose distributions established for the applicable fiscal year pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. At the start of each fiscal year, the department, and local coordinating organizations as applicable, shall distribute a portion of the funding to preschool providers based on the numbers and types of eligible children expected to enroll in preschool as estimated in the community plans or as estimated by the department for an area that does not have a local coordinating organization. The department and local coordinating organizations, as applicable, shall continue distributing portions of the funding periodically throughout the school year and shall adjust the amounts distributed based on the actual numbers and types of eligible children enrolled by preschool providers.

The department shall ensure that funding is allocated for preschool services for eligible children who are three years of age or younger, as described in subsection (3)(c) of this section, for children with disabilities, and for all eligible children who enroll in universal preschool services before funding is allocated for additional preschool services or for specified purposes as described in subsection (1)(d) of this section. In allocating funding for additional preschool services for eligible children, the department shall first allocate funding for additional preschool services for eligible children who are in low-income families and meet at least one qualifying factor and then allocate funding for additional preschool services for the remaining eligible children who are in low-income families.

In distributing funding for preschool services pursuant to this section for the 2023-24 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall ensure that the amount of funding required to provide preschool services to all three-year-old children with disabilities who enroll in the preschool program is annually distributed to the enrolling preschool providers and the amount described in subsection (3)(c)(I)(B) of this section is distributed to provide preschool services for eligible children who are three years of age or younger, as described in section 26.5-4-204 (3)(a)(III) and (3)(a)(IV).
(c) (I) (A) In distributing funding for preschool services pursuant to this section for the 2023-24 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall ensure that the amount of funding required to provide preschool services to all three-year-old children with disabilities who enroll in the preschool program is annually distributed to the enrolling preschool providers and the amount described in subsection (3)(c)(I)(B) of this section is distributed to provide preschool services for eligible children who are three years of age or younger, as described in section 26.5-4-204 (3)(a)(III) and (3)(a)(IV).

To provide services for eligible children who are three years of age or younger, the department shall annually distribute the amount allotted for the 2022-23 fiscal year to provide preschool services for children three years of age or younger through the "Colorado Preschool Program Act", article 28 of title 22, as it exists prior to July 1, 2023, calculated as an amount equal to the number of children three years of age or younger enrolled by each school district for the 2022-23 fiscal year multiplied by the per pupil funding, as described in section 22-54-104 (3) or (3.5), whichever is applicable, for the enrolling school district for the 2022-23 fiscal year.

The department and local coordinating organizations, as applicable, shall distribute the funding for preschool services for children who are three years of age or younger as described in subsection (3)(c)(I)(B) of this section only to preschool providers that are school districts or charter schools for the eligible children who are three years of age and younger whom the school district or charter school enrolls in accordance with the preschool program; except that, in a fiscal year in which the general assembly specifically appropriates an amount to provide preschool services for children three years of age or younger who do not have disabilities that exceeds the amount described in subsection (3)(c)(I)(B) of this section, the department may distribute in accordance with the applicable community plans all or any portion of the excess appropriation amount to community-based preschool providers. A school district may distribute all or a portion of the amount received pursuant to this subsection (3)(c)(II) to a head start agency or community-based preschool provider that provides preschool services pursuant to a contract with the school district.

Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (3)(c)(I) of this section to the contrary, in a fiscal year in which the amount described in subsection (3)(c)(I)(B) of this section to fund preschool services for children who are three years of age or younger is more than is required to fully fund the number of said eligible children who actually enroll for preschool services, the department may distribute the excess amount to fund universal preschool services, additional preschool services, or special purpose distributions in accordance with this section.

In a fiscal year in which the amount described in subsection (3)(c)(I)(B) of this section to fund preschool services for children who are three years of age or younger is less than is required to fully fund the number of said eligible children who actually enroll for preschool services, the department shall first provide funding for the eligible children with disabilities and eligible children who are in low-income families and meet at least one qualifying factor and then provide funding for the remaining eligible children who are in low-income families. If any amount of the appropriation described in subsection (3)(c)(I)(B) of this section remains, the department, working with the rules advisory council, the local coordinating organizations, and any other interested persons, shall establish the priority for distributing the funding among the remaining eligible children.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, if the funding that a preschool provider that is a school district or a charter school receives pursuant to this section for eligible children enrolled in the preschool program for the 2023-24 fiscal year, calculated as the per-child rates for the 2023-24 fiscal year multiplied by the number of eligible children the preschool provider enrolls for the 2023-24 fiscal year, is less than the amount of funding allotted for the 2022-23 fiscal year for the children the preschool provider enrolled through the Colorado preschool program, as it exists prior to July 1, 2023, calculated as fifty percent of the preschool provider's per pupil funding, as described in section 22-54-104 (3) or (3.5), whichever is applicable, for the 2022-23 fiscal year multiplied by the number of children the preschool provider enrolled through the Colorado preschool program and directly served for the 2022-23 fiscal year, the department shall distribute to the preschool provider for the 2023-24 fiscal year an amount equal to the difference in said amounts.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, if the funding that a community-based preschool provider receives pursuant to this section for eligible children enrolled in the preschool program for the 2023-24 fiscal year, calculated as the per-child rates for the 2023-24 fiscal year multiplied by the number of eligible children the preschool provider enrolls for the 2023-24 fiscal year, is less than the amount of funding the community-based preschool provider received for the 2022-23 fiscal year pursuant to a contract with a school district or charter school to indirectly serve children the school district or charter school enrolled through the Colorado preschool program, as it exists prior to July 1, 2023, for the 2022-23 fiscal year, the department shall distribute to the preschool provider for the 2023-24 fiscal year an amount equal to the difference in said amounts.

Any amount distributed pursuant to this subsection (4) is in addition to the amount calculated for the preschool provider for the 2023-24 fiscal year pursuant to this section.

The department shall collect, and preschool providers shall provide, the information required to implement this subsection (4), which may include but need not be limited to:

A school district's per pupil funding amount calculated for the 2022-23 fiscal year pursuant to section 22-54-104 (3) or (3.5), whichever is applicable;

The number of pupils that a preschool provider enrolled through the Colorado preschool program, as it exists prior to July 1, 2023, for the 2022-23 fiscal year; and

The amounts paid by school districts and charter schools to community-based preschool providers pursuant to contracts entered into for the 2022-23 fiscal year in accordance with the Colorado preschool program, as it exists prior to July 1, 2023.

This subsection (4) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

A preschool provider that receives funding distributed pursuant to this section shall use the money only to pay the costs of providing preschool services directly to eligible children enrolled by the preschool provider or by a subcontracted preschool provider as authorized for a school district in subsection (3)(c)(II) of this section. Costs of providing preschool services include:

Teacher and paraprofessional salaries and benefits;

The cost of providing to teachers and paraprofessionals any professional development activities associated with the preschool services;

The costs incurred in purchasing supplies and materials used in providing the preschool services;

Any additional costs that a preschool provider would not have incurred but for the services provided in conjunction with the preschool services; and

A reasonable allocation of overhead costs as provided by department rule.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"District extended high school pupil enrollment" has the same meaning as provided in section 22-54-103.

"Funded pupil count" has the same meaning as provided in section 22-54-103.

"Online pupil enrollment" has the same meaning as provided in section 22-54-103.

"State average per pupil funding amount" means the statewide total amount of per pupil funding, as described in section 22-54-104 (3) or (3.5), calculated for all school districts for the 2022-23 budget year divided by the statewide total funded pupil count, minus the statewide total district extended high school pupil enrollment and the statewide total online pupil enrollment, for the 2022-23 budget year.

"State per pupil preschool funding rate for children with disabilities for the 2022-23 budget year" means an amount equal to the state's share percentage of statewide total program funding for all school districts calculated pursuant to the "Public School Finance Act of 1994", article 54 of title 22, for the 2022-23 budget year multiplied by the state average per pupil funding amount for the 2022-23 budget year.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 700, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-209. Preschool programs cash fund - created - use.

The preschool programs cash fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money credited to the fund pursuant to section 24-22-118 (2), money transferred to the fund pursuant to section 39-28-116 (6), money annually transferred to the fund as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section, and any additional money the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the preschool programs cash fund to the fund. The general assembly shall annually appropriate money in the preschool programs cash fund to the department to implement the preschool program.

For the 2023-24 fiscal year, the general assembly shall transfer to the preschool programs cash fund from the general fund or the state education fund created in section 17 of article IX of the state constitution an amount equal to the difference between the amount of the state share of total program calculated pursuant to article 54 of title 22 for the 2022-23 budget year, after application of the budget stabilization factor and after any mid-year adjustment, and the amount that the state share of total program, after application of the budget stabilization factor and after any mid-year adjustment, would be for the 2022-23 budget year if calculated without including the statewide preschool program enrollment, as defined in section 22-54-103, for the 2022-23 budget year and the number of three- and four-year-old pupils with disabilities receiving an educational program under the "Exceptional Children's Educational Act", article 20 of title 22, for the 2022-23 budget year.

For the 2024-25 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the general assembly shall annually transfer to the preschool programs cash fund from the general fund or the state education fund created in section 17 of article IX of the state constitution an amount equal to the amount described in subsection (1)(b)(I) of this section increased annually, beginning in the 2024-25 fiscal year, by the rate of inflation.

In addition to the money appropriated from the fund, the department may seek, accept, and expend public and private gifts, grants, and donations to implement the preschool program.

The department shall prioritize the use of money appropriated from the preschool programs cash fund to provide funding for ten hours of voluntary preschool services per week, at no charge, to Colorado children during the school year preceding the school year in which a child is eligible to enroll in kindergarten, to provide funding for preschool services for children with disabilities, and to provide funding for preschool services for eligible children who are three years of age or younger as described in section 26.5-4-204 (3)(a)(III) and (3)(a)(IV).

The department shall use money remaining in the preschool programs cash fund after the uses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section to provide additional preschool services for children who are in low-income families or who meet at least one qualifying factor.

In furtherance of the purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section and to meet an expansion of preschool populations, in addition to the use described in subsection (3)(b) of this section, the department may use money remaining in the fund after meeting the uses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section to ensure the availability of quality, voluntary preschool services provided through a mixed delivery system by means the department deems appropriate including:

Recruiting, training, and retaining early childhood education professionals;

Expanding or improving the staff, facilities, equipment, technology, and physical infrastructure of preschool providers to increase preschool access;

Parent and family outreach to facilitate timely and effective enrollment; and

Such other uses as are consistent with and further the purpose of the preschool program.

The department may use money appropriated from the preschool programs cash fund for the administrative costs of local coordinating organizations.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 706, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to several provisions of former section 24-22-118 (3) as they existed prior to 2022. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

26.5-4-210. Reporting.

Beginning with the hearing held in January of 2025 as part of the annual hearing held pursuant to the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2, the department shall report on the implementation and effectiveness of the Colorado universal preschool program in the preceding fiscal year. At a minimum, the report must include:

The number of eligible children served by preschool providers, specifying:

The number of eligible children who received only universal preschool services;

The number of eligible children with disabilities who received preschool services;

The number of eligible children three years of age and younger who received preschool services;

The number of eligible children who received additional preschool services;

The number and percentage of eligible children enrolled in the preschool program who were in low-income families and who met one or more qualifying factors, including identifying the qualifying factors that were met; and

The demographics of the eligible children enrolled in the preschool program, including, but not limited to, race, ethnicity, disability, and income;

The number of children who were eligible to receive funding for additional preschool services but did not due to insufficient funding and the amount that would have fully funded additional preschool services for all eligible children;

The number of eligible children who did not enroll in preschool providers;

The extent to which a mixed delivery system of preschool providers is available and the enrollment capacity of the mixed delivery system throughout the state;

The amount of funding distributed to preschool providers through the preschool program, in total and disaggregated by communities with local coordinating organizations and areas of the state that do not have local coordinating organizations;

The per-child rates established pursuant to section 26.5-4-208 (1) for universal preschool services, preschool services for children with disabilities, preschool services for eligible children who are three years of age or younger, and additional preschool services for the fiscal year with an explanation of the formulas for determining the per-child rates;

Of the amount appropriated from the preschool programs cash fund, the amount, expressed as a dollar amount and a percentage of the total appropriation, that:

Was distributed to fund universal preschool services;

Was distributed to fund preschool services for children with disabilities;

Was distributed to fund preschool services for eligible children three years of age and younger;

Was distributed to fund additional preschool services;

Was distributed for specified purposes pursuant to section 26.5-4-208 (1)(d) with an explanation of each specified purpose and the preschool providers or communities that received the distributions;

Is attributable to each weighting factor, if any, included in the formulas created pursuant to section 26.5-4-208 (1); and

Was spent on administrative expenses of the department and each local coordinating organization;

The number of eligible children for whom additional preschool services or other full-day preschool services were provided using resources other than the money distributed through the preschool program and the sources of those resources;

Quantitative data, and qualitative data if available, including student outcomes to the extent they are available, demonstrating the effectiveness of the preschool program in improving the overall learning and school readiness of children who receive preschool services through the preschool program, including the results of the independent evaluation conducted pursuant to section 26.5-4-207 (2);

The changes, if any, in the availability of child care for infants and toddlers, statewide and within communities or areas, following implementation of the preschool program;

Any other information that indicates the effectiveness of the preschool program in serving eligible children throughout the state; and

Any recommendations for legislative or regulatory changes to improve the effectiveness of the preschool program.

The department may request and local coordinating organizations and preschool providers shall provide information as necessary for the department to prepare the report described in subsection (1) of this section.

The department shall annually publish on the department website the information provided in the report described in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 707, § 3, effective July 1.